Tennessee statutes. Title 66 Property
Part 1

General Provisions

66-11-101. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Contract” means an agreement for improving real property, written or unwritten, express or implied, and includes extras as defined in this section;

“Contract price” means the amount agreed upon by the contracting parties to be paid for performing work or labor or for furnishing materials, machinery, equipment, services, overhead and profit, included in the contract, increased or diminished by the price of extras or breach of contract, including defects in workmanship or materials. If no price is agreed upon by the contracting parties, “contract price” means the reasonable value of all work, labor, materials, services, equipment, machinery, overhead and profit included in the contract;

“Extras” means labor, materials, services, equipment, machinery, overhead and profit, for improving real property, authorized by the owner and not included in previous contracts;

“Furnish materials” means:

To supply materials that are intended to be and are incorporated in the improvement;

To supply materials that are intended to be and are delivered to the site of the improvement and become normal wastage in construction operations;

To specially fabricate materials for incorporation in the improvement and, if not delivered to the site of the improvement, are not readily resalable by the lienor;

To supply materials that are used for the construction and do not remain in the improvement, subject to diminution by the salvage value of such material; or

To supply tools, equipment, or machinery as permitted by § 66-11-102(g);

The delivery of materials to the site of the improvement shall be prima facie evidence of incorporation of such materials in the improvement;

“Improvement” means the result of any action or any activity in furtherance of constructing, erecting, altering, repairing, demolishing, removing, or furnishing materials or labor for any building, structure, appurtenance to the building or structure, fixture, bridge, driveway, private roadway, sidewalk, walkway, wharf, sewer, utility, watering system, or other similar enhancement, or any part thereof, on, connected with, or beneath the surface; the drilling and finishing of a well, other than a well for gas or oil; the furnishing of any work and labor relating to the placement of tile for the drainage of any lot or land; the excavation, cleanup, or removal of hazardous and nonhazardous material or waste from real property; the enhancement or embellishment of real property by seeding, sodding, or the planting on real property of any shrubs, trees, plants, vines, small fruits, flowers, nursery stock, or vegetation or decorative materials of any kind; the taking down, cleanup, or removal of any existing shrubs, trees, plants, vines, small fruits, flowers, nursery stock, or vegetation or decorative materials of any kind then existing; excavating, grading or filling to establish a grade; the work of land surveying, as defined in § 62-18-102, and the performance of architectural or engineering work, as defined in title 62, chapter 2, with respect to an improvement actually made to the real estate. As the context requires, “improvement” also means the real property thus improved;

“Laborer” means any individual who, under contract, of any degree of remoteness, personally performs labor for improving real property on the site of the improvement;

“Lienor” means any person having a lien or right of lien on real property by virtue of this chapter, and includes the person's successor in interest;

“Owner” includes the owner in fee of real property, or of a less estate in real property, a lessee for a term of years, a vendee in possession under a contract for the purchase of real property, and any person having any right, title or interest, legal or equitable, in real property, that may be sold under process;

“Owner-occupant” means any owner of real property who, at the time the owner contracts for the improvement of the real property, occupies the real property as the owner's principal place of residence;

“Perform”, when used in connection with the words labor or services, means performance by the lienor or by another for the lienor;

“Person” means an individual, corporation, limited liability company, partnership, limited partnership, sole proprietorship, joint venture, association, trust, estate, or other legal or commercial entity;

“Prime contractor” means a person, including a land surveyor as defined in § 62-18-102, a person licensed to practice architecture or engineering under title 62, chapter 2, and any person other than a remote contractor who supervises or performs work or labor or who furnishes material, services, equipment, or machinery in furtherance of any improvement; provided, that the person is in direct privity of contract with an owner, or the owner's agent, of the improvement. A “prime contractor” also includes a person who takes over from a prime contractor the entire remaining work under such a contract;

“Real property” includes real estate, lands, tenements and hereditaments, corporeal and incorporeal, and fixtures and improvements thereon;

“Remote contractor” means a person, including a land surveyor as defined in § 62-18-102 and a person licensed to practice architecture or engineering under title 62, chapter 2, who provides work or labor or who furnishes material, services, equipment or machinery in furtherance of any improvement under a contract with a person other than an owner;

“Single family residence” means any real property owned and occupied by no one other than the owner and the owner's immediate family; and

“Visible commencement of operations” means the first actual work of improving upon the land or the first delivery to the site of the improvement of materials, that remain on the land until actually incorporated in the improvement, of such manifest and substantial character as to notify interested persons that an improvement is being made or is about to be made on the land, excluding, however, demolition, surveying, excavating, clearing, filling or grading, placement of sewer or drainage lines or other utility lines or work preparatory therefor, erection of temporary security fencing and the delivery of materials therefor.

Code 1932, § 7913; Acts 1965, ch. 312, §§ 1, 2; 1968, ch. 587, § 1; 1975, ch. 264, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1101; Acts 1990, ch. 641, §§ 1, 2; 2007, ch. 189, § 1; 2013, ch. 469, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 469, § 6 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on or after July 1, 2013, and to liens filed for construction performed on or after July 1, 2013.

Cross-References. Abandonment defined, §66-11-112.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 8.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 8-701, 8-703, 8-704, 8-1101.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Mechanics' Liens, §§ 3-6, 8-12; 21 Tenn. Juris., Railroads, § 55.

Law Reviews.

Mechanics' and Materialmen's Liens, 45 Tenn. L. Rev. 741.

The Art of Perfecting Mechanics' and Materialmens' Liens in Tennessee (Arthur M. Fowler III), 40 No. 3 Tenn. B.J. 17 (2004).

66-11-102. Lien for work and materials.

There shall be a lien on any lot or tract of real property upon which an improvement has been made by a prime contractor or any remote contractor; provided, that the lienor has complied with title 62, chapter 6. If the lienor has not fully complied with title 62, chapter 6, no lien is established by this chapter. The lien shall secure the contract price.

The lien established by this section shall include a lien on any lot or tract of real property in favor of any land surveyor who has, by contract with the owner or agent of the owner of the real property, performed on the property the practice of land surveying, as defined in § 62-18-102. The lien shall secure the contract price.

The lien established by this section shall include a lien on any lot or tract of real property upon which an improvement has been made, by contract with the owner or the owner's agent, in favor of any person licensed to practice architecture or engineering under title 62, chapter 2, for architectural or engineering services performed with respect to the improvement actually made. The lien shall secure the contract price.

The lien provided for in subdivision (c)(1) shall attach as of the time of visible commencement of operations as provided in § 66-11-104.

This subsection (c) shall not apply to owner-occupants of one-family or two-family detached unit homes.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, no prime contractor or remote contractor of a lessee of real property may encumber the fee estate unless the lessee is deemed to be the fee owner's agent. In determining whether a lessee is the fee owner's agent, the court shall determine whether the fee owner has the right to control the conduct of the lessee with respect to the improvement and shall consider:

Whether the lease requires the lessee to construct a specific improvement on the fee owner's property;

Whether the cost of the improvement actually is borne by the fee owner through corresponding offsets in the amount of rent the lessee pays;

Whether the fee owner maintains control over the improvement; and

Whether the improvement becomes the property of the fee owner at the end of the lease.

A lien arising under this chapter shall not include in the lien amount any interest, service charges, late fees, attorney fees, or other amounts to which the lienor may be entitled by contract or law that do not result in an improvement to the real property or are otherwise not permitted by this chapter.

When a lienor, without default, is prevented from completely performing the lienor's part, the lienor is entitled to a lien for as much of the contract price as the lienor has performed in proportion to the contract price for the whole, and the lienor's claim shall be adjusted accordingly.

A lien for furnishing tools, equipment, or machinery arises under this chapter to the following extent:

For the reasonable rental value for the period of actual use and any reasonable period of nonuse taken into account in the rental contract; except that the reasonable rental value and reasonable periods of use and nonuse need not be determined solely by the contract; or

For the purchase price of the tools, equipment or machinery, but the lien for the price only arises if the tools, equipment or machinery were purchased for use in the course of the particular improvement and have no substantial value to the lienor after the completion of the improvement on which they were used.

Code 1858, § 1981 (deriv. Acts 1845-1846, ch. 118, §§ 1, 2); Acts 1859-1860, ch. 114, § 1; Shan., § 3531; mod. Code 1932, § 7914; Acts 1977, ch. 380, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1102; Acts 1982, ch. 639, §§ 1, 2; 1990, ch. 854, § 2; 2007, ch. 189, § 2; 2013, ch. 469, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 469, § 6 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on or after July 1, 2013, and to liens filed for construction performed on or after July 1, 2013.

Cross-References. Notice to landowner, effect, §§66-11-203 —66-11-207.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 471.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Liens, § 2; 18 Tenn. Juris., Mechanics' Liens, §§ 2-4, 6-12, 13, 14, 17-19.

Law Reviews.

Mechanics' and Materialmen's Liens in Tennessee (Charles H. Barnett), 5 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 359 (1975).

66-11-103. Contract with owner's spouse.

When the contract for improving real property is made with a husband or a wife who is not separated and living apart from that person's spouse, and the property is owned by the other spouse or by both spouses, the spouse who is the contracting party shall be deemed to be the agent of the other spouse unless the other spouse serves the prime contractor with written notice of that spouse's objection to the contract within ten (10) days after learning of the contract.

Code 1932, § 7933; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1103; Acts 2007, ch. 189, § 3.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Agency, § 2.

66-11-104. Time of attachment of lien.

The lien provided by this chapter shall attach and take effect from the time of the visible commencement of operations, excluding however, demolition, surveying, excavating, clearing, filling or grading, placement of sewer or drainage lines, or other utility lines or work preparatory therefor, erection of temporary security fencing and the delivery of materials therefor.

If there is a cessation of all operations at the site of the improvement for more than ninety (90) days and a subsequent visible resumption of operations, any lien for labor performed or for materials furnished after the visible resumption of operations shall attach and take effect only from the visible resumption of operations.

Nothing in this section shall affect the priority or parity of any liens as established by any section of this chapter.

Code 1932, § 7915; Acts 1977, ch. 424, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1104; Acts 1996, ch. 591, § 1; 2007, ch. 189, § 4; 2013, ch. 469, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 469, § 6 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on or after July 1, 2013, and to liens filed for construction performed on or after July 1, 2013.

Law Reviews.

Mechanics' Liens in Tennessee — Recent Developments, 6 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 519 (1976).

1996 Real Estate Legislation: What You Don't Know Can Hurt You (William R. Bruce), 32 No. 6 Tenn. B.J. 12 (1996).

66-11-105. Extent of lien — Removal of property.

The lien shall extend to, and only to, the owner's right, title or interest in the real property and improvements on the real property existing at the time of the visible commencement of operations or thereafter acquired or constructed.

If any part of the real property or improvements subject to the lien is removed by the owner or any other person at any time before discharge of the lien, the removal shall not affect the rights of the lienor either in respect to the real property and improvements or the part so removed.

Code 1932, § 7916; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1105; Acts 2007, ch. 189, § 5.

Law Reviews.

Mechanics' and Materialmen's Liens in Tennessee (Charles H. Barnett), 5 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 359 (1975).

66-11-106. Duration of lien.

A prime contractor's lien shall continue for one (1) year after the date the improvement is complete or is abandoned, and until the final decision of any suit properly brought within that time for its enforcement.

Code 1858, § 1985 (deriv. Acts 1845-1846, ch. 118, § 1); Shan., § 3539; mod. Code 1932, § 7917; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1106; Acts 2007, ch. 189, § 6.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Mechanics' Liens, §§ 5, 14, 18, 23.

Law Reviews.

Mechanics' and Materialmen's Liens in Tennessee (Charles H. Barnett), 5 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 359 (1975).

66-11-107. Parity of liens — Priority of laborers' liens.

All liens provided by this chapter, except those of laborers, shall be on a parity, and shall be treated pro rata. All liens of laborers shall be on a parity one with another, and shall have priority over all other liens created by this chapter.

Code 1858, § 1984 (deriv. Acts 1845-1846, ch. 118, § 1); Shan., § 3538; mod. Code 1932, § 7926; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1107; Acts 2007, ch. 189, § 7.

Law Reviews.

Mechanics' and Materialmen's Liens in Tennessee (Charles H. Barnett), 5 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 359 (1975).

Titles as Affected by Liens (Hugh A. Tapp), 28 Tenn. L. Rev. 352 (1961).

66-11-108. Priority over mortgage.

If the contract for an improvement is made with a mortgagor, and the lienor has served the mortgagee with written notice of the same by certified or registered mail before the work is begun or materials furnished by the lienor, and the mortgagee gives written consent thereto by certified or registered mail, the lien provided by this chapter to that lienor shall have priority over the mortgage; and if the mortgagee fails to serve a written objection by certified or registered mail within ten (10) days after receipt of the notice, the mortgagee's consent shall be implied; provided, that the person giving notice shall include a name and return address to which the written objection shall be served. If notice is not served in accordance with this section, then the lien shall not have priority over a mortgage otherwise entitled to priority over the lien under applicable law.

Code 1858, § 1982 (deriv. Acts 1857-1858, ch. 24, §§ 1, 2); Shan., § 3536; Code 1932, § 7924; Acts 1975, ch. 200, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1108; Acts 2007, ch. 189, § 8.

Cross-References. Certified mail in lieu of registered mail, §1-3-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Mechanics' Liens, §§ 15-19.

Law Reviews.

Mechanics' and Materialmen's Liens in Tennessee (Charles H. Barnett), 5 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 359 (1975).

66-11-109. Priority for other liens not created by this chapter.

Section 66-11-108 shall also apply to any other person claiming a lien not created by this chapter.

Code 1858, § 1983 (deriv. Acts 1857-1858, ch. 24, § 2); Shan., § 3537; Code 1932, § 7925; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1109; Acts 2007, ch. 189, § 9.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Mechanics' Liens, §§ 18, 19.

Law Reviews.

Mechanics' and Materialmen's Liens in Tennessee (Charles H. Barnett), 5 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 359 (1975).

66-11-110. Effect of judgment lien.

A judgment lien of record shall not defeat a lien provided by this chapter, if the lien provided by this chapter is fixed on the real property in good faith and without collusion.

Code 1932, § 7942; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1110; Acts 2007, ch. 189, § 10.

Cross-References. Judgment lien, title 25, ch. 5.

66-11-111. Authentication and registration of lien.

Where the lienor's contract is in writing, and has been acknowledged, or in lieu of acknowledgment is sworn to by the prime contractor as to its execution by the owner, it may be recorded in the lien book in the register of deeds of the county where the real property, or any part of the affected real property, lies. Subsequent purchasers or encumbrancers for value shall be deemed to have notice of the lien so long as the recorded contract sets forth the contract price and describes the real property with reasonable certainty.

Code 1932, § 7918; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1111; Acts 2007, ch. 189, § 11.

Cross-References. Notice to owner of property, §§66-11-115,66-11-203.

Protection from unregistered lien, §66-11-143.

Registration fee, §8-21-1001.

Law Reviews.

Mechanics' and Materialmen's Liens in Tennessee (Charles H. Barnett), 5 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 359 (1975).

66-11-112. Preservation of priority of lien for subsequent purchasers or encumbrancers — Abandonment — Lien on structure with water furnished by well — Form for notice of lien.

In order to preserve the priority of the lien provided by this chapter as of the date of its attachment, as concerns subsequent purchasers or encumbrancers for a valuable consideration without notice of the lien, though not as concerns the owner, the lienor, who has not recorded the lienor's contract pursuant to § 66-11-111, is required to record in the office of the register of deeds of the county where the real property, or any part affected, lies, a sworn statement of the amount for, and a reasonably certain description of the real property on, which the lien is claimed. The recording party shall pay filing fees, and shall be provided a receipt for the filing fees, which amount shall be part of the lien amount. Recordation is required to be done no later than ninety (90) days after the date the improvement is complete or is abandoned, prior to which time the lien shall be effective as against the purchasers or encumbrancers without the recordation. The owner shall serve thirty (30) days' notice on prime contractors and on all of those lienors who have served notice in accordance with § 66-11-145 prior to the owner's transfer of any interest to a subsequent purchaser or encumbrancer for a valuable consideration. If the sworn statement is not recorded within that time, the lien's priority as to subsequent purchasers or encumbrancers shall be determined as if it attached as of the time the sworn statement is recorded.

A building, structure or improvement shall be deemed to have been abandoned for purposes of this chapter when there is a cessation of operation for a period of ninety (90) days and an intent on the part of the owner or prime contractor to cease operations permanently, or at least for an indefinite period.

Any other provision to the contrary notwithstanding, any lien acquired under contract executed on or after April 17, 1972, by virtue of § 66-11-141, may be filed within ninety (90) days after completion of the structure that is, or is intended to be, furnished water by virtue of drilling a well.

The statement provided for in subsection (a) may be in substantially the following form:

NOTICE OF LIEN State of County of being first duly sworn, says that , the Lien Claimant, furnished certain material or performed certain work or labor in furtherance of improvements to the real property hereinafter described, in pursuance of a certain contract, with , [the owner, prime contractor, remote contractor, or other person, as the case may be]. The first of the work or labor was performed or the first of the material, services, equipment, or machinery was furnished on the day of , (year). The last of the work or labor was performed or the last of the material, services, equipment, or machinery was furnished on the day of , (year), and there is justly and truly due Lien Claimant therefor from , [the owner, prime contractor, remote contractor, or other person, as the case may be] over and above all legal setoffs, the sum of dollars, for which amount Lien Claimant claims a lien under T.C.A. §§66-11-101, et seq. on the real property, of which is or was the owner, which is described as follows: Lienor [Notary Acknowledgment]

Click to view form.

Code 1932, § 7919; Acts 1972, ch. 747, §§ 1, 3; 1977, ch. 373, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1112; Acts 1990, ch. 854, § 3; 2007, ch. 189, § 12.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 4 Tenn. Juris., Bankruptcy, § 8; 18 Tenn. Juris., Mechanics' Liens, §§ 14, 15, 18.

Law Reviews.

Creditors' Rights and Security Transactions — 1954 Tennessee Survey, 7 Vand. L. Rev. 799.

Mechanics' and Materialmen's Liens in Tennessee (Charles H. Barnett), 5 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 359 (1975).

Survey of Tennessee Property Law, VII. Registration of Instruments (Toxey H. Sewell), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 193 (1979).

The Collection of Debts from Insolvent and Fully-Mortgaged Debtors (John A. Walker, Jr.), 43 Tenn. L. Rev. 399 (1976).

66-11-113. Materials exempt from attachment, execution or other process to enforce debt.

Whenever materials have been furnished to improve real property and delivered to the real property by or for a lienor, and payment for the materials has not been made by the owner of the real property, the materials shall not be subject to attachment, execution, or other legal process to enforce any debt due by the purchaser of the materials, except a debt due for the purchase price of the materials, so long as in good faith the materials are about to be applied to improve the real property; but if the owner has made payment for materials furnished, the materials shall not be subject to attachment, execution, or other process to enforce any debt, including the debt due for the purchase price for the materials.

Code 1932, § 7923; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1113; Acts 2007, ch. 189, § 13.

66-11-114. Repossession and removal of materials.

If for any reason an improvement is abandoned before completion or, though completed, materials delivered are not used for the improvement, a person who furnished materials for the improvement that have not been incorporated in the improvement, and for which the person has not received payment, may repossess and remove the materials; and thereupon the person shall not be entitled to any lien on the real property or improvements for the price of the materials, but shall have the same rights in regard to the materials as if the person had never parted with the possession.

The right to repossess and remove the materials shall not be affected by their sale, encumbrance, attachment or transfer from the site of the improvement subsequent to delivery to the site, except that the right to repossess shall not be effective as against a purchaser or encumbrancer of the materials in good faith whose interest in the materials arose since removal from the site of the improvement, or as against a creditor attaching after the removal.

The right of repossession and removal given by this section shall extend only to materials whose purchase price does not exceed the amount remaining due to the person repossessing; but where materials have been partly paid for, the person delivering them may repossess them as allowed in this section on refunding the part of the purchase price that has been paid.

Code 1932, § 7922; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1114; Acts 2007, ch. 189, § 14.

66-11-115. Liens by remote contractors.

Every remote contractor shall have the lien provided by this part for work or labor performed or materials, services, equipment, or machinery furnished by the remote contractor in furtherance of the improvement; provided, that the remote contractor:

Satisfies all of the requirements set forth in § 66-11-145, if applicable; and

Within the time provided for recording sworn statements set out in § 66-11-112(a), serves a notice of lien, in writing, on the owner of the property on which the improvement is being made.

The lien shall continue for the period of ninety (90) days from the date of service of notice in favor of the remote contractor, and until the final termination of any suit for its enforcement properly brought pursuant to § 66-11-126 within that period.

The notice of lien may be in substantially the form provided in § 66-11-112(d).

Code 1858, § 1986 (deriv. Acts 1845-1846, ch. 118, § 2); Acts 1881, ch. 67, § 2; 1889, ch. 103, § 1; Shan., § 3540; Acts 1927, ch. 35, §§ 1, 2; mod. Code 1932, § 7927; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1115; Acts 1990, ch. 854, § 4; 2007, ch. 189, § 15.

Cross-References. Notice to owner of property, §66-11-203.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 8-705.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Mechanics' Liens, §§ 2, 3, 5, 7, 10, 12-18, 23; 24 Tenn. Juris., Vendor and Purchaser, § 65.

Law Reviews.

Mechanics' and Materialmen's Liens, 45 Tenn. L. Rev. 741 (1978).

66-11-116. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §66-11-116 (Code 1932, § 7928; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1116), concerning laborer's notice to owner a benefit to others and when notice is not required, was repealed by Acts 1990, ch. 854, § 5, effective July 1, 1990.

66-11-117. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §66-11-117 (Acts 1889, ch. 103, § 1; Shan., § 3541; mod. Code 1932, § 7929; modified; Acts 1972, ch. 747, §§ 2, 3; 1977, ch. 373, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1117), concerning precedence of mechanic's contract, was repealed by Acts 2007, ch. 189, § 16, effective May 18, 2007.

66-11-118. Multiple lots or improvements.

Where the amount due is for work or labor performed or materials, services, equipment, or machinery furnished for a single improvement on contiguous or adjacent lots, parcels or tracts of land and the work or labor is performed or the materials, services, equipment, or machinery is furnished under the same contract or contracts, a lienor shall be required to serve or record only one (1) claim of lien covering the entire claim against the real property.

If two (2) or more lots, parcels, or tracts of land are improved under the same contract or contracts and the improvements are not to be operated as a single improvement, a lienor who has performed work or labor or furnished materials, services, equipment, or machinery for the improvement shall, in claiming a lien, apportion the lienor's contract price between the several lots, parcels, or tracts of land and improvements on the lots, parcels, or tracts of land, and serve a separate notice of lien for the amount claimed against each lot, parcel, or tract of land and the improvements on the lot, parcel, or tract of land.

Unless the improvements are to be operated as a single improvement, whenever more than one (1) building or unit is constructed upon or other improvement is made to a single lot, parcel or tract of land or to contiguous lots, parcels or tracts of land, the visible commencement of operations as defined in this chapter with respect to each separate building, unit or other improvement shall not be deemed to constitute or otherwise relate to the visible commencement of operations with respect to any other building, unit or improvement on any single lot, parcel or tract of land or any contiguous lots, parcels or tracts of land. In connection therewith, a lienor who has performed work or labor or furnished materials, services, equipment, or machinery shall, in claiming a lien, apportion the lienor's contract price between the separate buildings, units or improvements on the buildings or units as applicable and serve or record a separate claim of lien for the amount claimed against each separate building, unit or improvement; in such event, the time prescribed in §§ 66-11-112 and 66-11-115 for serving or recording notice of lien shall commence to run with respect to each building, unit or improvement immediately upon the completion or abandonment of the building, unit or improvement.

Whenever a lienor has furnished work, labor, or materials, services, equipment, or machinery for improvements that are to be operated as a single improvement on a single lot, parcel or tract of land or contiguous lots, parcels or tracts of land, the lienor shall be required to serve or record only a single notice of lien covering the lienor's entire claim against the real property.

Except as expressly provided in the Horizontal Property Act, compiled in chapter 27 of this title, and notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a lien arising under this chapter by reason of an improvement that is part of a common interest community does not attach to the common elements, but attaches to the units as follows:

If the improvement was contracted for by the association of unit owners, however denominated, the lien attaches to all the units in the common interest community for which the association acts, unless the association notifies the lienor, when the contract is made, that the lien may attach only to the unit or units on or for the benefit of which the improvement was made; and

If the improvement was contracted for by a unit owner, the lien attaches only to that owner's unit.

Code 1932, § 7936; Acts 1975, ch. 317, § 1; 1976, ch. 533, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1118; Acts 1990, ch. 641, §§ 3, 4; 2007, ch. 189, § 17.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 8-703.

Law Reviews.

Mechanics' Liens in Tennessee — Recent Developments, 6 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 519 (1976).

66-11-119. Amendment of notice of lien.

Any notice of lien served or recorded as provided in this chapter may be amended at any time during the period allowed for serving or recording the notice; provided, that the notice and amendment are served or recorded in good faith and the amendment is not shown to be prejudicial to another interested person.

Any amendment of the notice of lien shall be served or recorded in the same manner as is provided for the original notice.

Code 1932, §§ 7930, 7931; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1119; Acts 2007, ch. 189, § 18.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 8-704.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Mechanics' Liens, § 23.

66-11-120. Lien limited to contract price and extras in the contract.

The claims secured by lien for work, labor, materials, equipment, services, machinery, overhead and profit, shall not exceed the contract price and extras in the contract between the owner and the prime contractor.

Code 1858, § 1988 (deriv. Acts 1845-1846, ch. 118, § 2); Shan., § 3544; mod. Code 1932, § 7937; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1120; Acts 2007, ch. 189, § 19.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Mechanics' Liens, §§ 2, 3, 10, 13, 20.

Law Reviews.

Mechanic's Lien — Quantum Meruit as an Alternative Remedy, 34 Tenn. L. Rev. 518 (1967).

Titles as Affected by Liens (Hugh A. Tapp), 28 Tenn. L. Rev. 352 (1961).

66-11-121. Insurance proceeds subject to liens.

The proceeds of any insurance that by the terms of the policy are payable to the owner of real property improved, and are actually received by or are to be received by the owner because of the destruction or removal by fire or other casualty of an improvement on which lienors have performed labor, or for which they have furnished materials, services, equipment, or machinery shall, after the owner has been reimbursed from the proceeds for premiums paid for the insurance by the owner, if any, be subject to liens provided by this chapter to the same extent and in the same order of priority as the real property would have been had the improvement not been so destroyed or removed.

The proceeds of any insurance that by the terms of the policy are payable to a prime contractor or remote contractor, and are received or to be received by the prime contractor or remote contractor, shall, after the prime contractor or remote contractor has been reimbursed from the proceeds for premiums paid for the insurance by the prime contractor or remote contractor, if any, be liable for the payment for labor or materials, services, equipment, or machinery furnished and for which the prime contractor or remote contractor is liable in the same manner and under the same conditions as payments to the prime contractor or remote contractor under the contract would have been had the improvements not been so destroyed or removed.

Code 1932, § 7934; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1121; Acts 2007, ch. 189, § 20.

66-11-122. Transfer of debt without notice.

This lien shall not pass to any person to whom the debt is transferred without notice of the lien.

Code 1858, § 1989 (deriv. Acts 1845-1846, ch. 118, § 2); Shan., § 3545; mod. Code 1932, § 7938; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1122; Acts 2007, ch. 189, § 21.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Mechanics' Liens, § 8.

66-11-123. Transfer of debt by contractor.

The lien of another shall not be lost where any prime contractor or remote contractor has transferred or assigned the debt or charge due that lienor.

Code 1858, § 1990 (deriv. Acts 1845-1846, ch. 118, § 2); Acts 1885, ch. 8; Shan., § 3546; mod. Code 1932, § 7941; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1123; Acts 2007, ch. 189, § 22.